Utah statutes.
19-3-206.   Direction to compact committee member.

The Utah compact committee member designated under Section 19-3-204 may not bring to the committee for approval and shall vote to disapprove any arrangement under Subsection 19-3-204(4) for a facility to receive class B or class C low-level radioactive waste for commercial storage, decay in storage, treatment, incineration, or disposal within the state.

